en: Gizzards
fr: Gésiers
hr: Želudaci
nl: Spiermaag

en: Geese offals
fr: Abats d'oie

en: Frozen geese offals
fr: Abats d'oie surgelés

en: Goose gizzards
fr: Gésiers d'oie
hr: Guščji želudci
nl: Ganzenspiermaag

en: Duck offals
fr: Abats de canard

en: Frozen duck offals
fr: Abats de canard surgelés

en: Duck gizzards
fr: Gésiers de canard
hr: Pačji želudac
nl: Eendenspiermaag

en: preserved duck gizzards, Canned preserved duck gizzards
fr: Gésiers de canard confits, Gésiers de canard confits en conserve, Gésiers de canard confits appertisés

en: Chicken gizzards
fr: Gésiers de poulet
hr: Pileći želudac
nl: Kippenspiermaag

en: Tripe dishes
de: Kutteln
fr: Produits tripiers
hr: Jela od škembića
nl: Pensproducten

en: Tongues, tongue
fr: Langues, langue

en: Cooked tongues, cooked tongue
fr: Langues cuites, langue cuite

en: Chicken offals
fr: Abats de poulets, Abats de poulet

en: Foies gras
ca: Foie-gras
da: Foies gras
de: Foie gras, Stopfleber
es: Foies gras
fi: ankanmaksa
fr: Foies gras, Foie gras
he: כבד אווז
hr: Foies gras
it: Foie gras
ja: フォアグラ
nl: Foie gras
pt: Foies gras

en: Goose liver, goose liver
fr: Foie d'oie

en: Block of foie gras
fr: Bloc de foie gras
hr: Blok foie gras
nl: Foie gras blokken

fr: Bloc de foie gras avec morceaux
nl: Foie de gras blokken met stukjes

en: Whole foies gras, whole fat livers
ca: Foies sencers, fetges de greix sencers
de: Gänsestopflebern am Stück, Ganze Gänsestopflebern
es: Foies gras entero
fi: kokonaiset rasvamaksat
fr: Foies gras entiers
hr: Cijela foies gras
it: Foie gras intero
nl: Hele foie gras

fr: Foies gras cuits, foies gras cuit, foie gras cuit
nl: Gekookte foie gras

en: Foies gras from ducks, fat liver from ducks, Block of duck foie gras
ca: Foie-gras d'ànec, Foie de fetge d'ànec
de: Gänseleber, Gänseleberpastete, Fettleber von der Ente
es: Foies gras de patos
fi: Ankan rasvamaksat
fr: Foies gras de canard, Foie gras de canard, Bloc de foie gras de canard
he: כבד ברווז
hr: Foies gras od pataka
hu: Zsíros kacsamáj
it: Foie gras d'oca
nl: Eendenfoie gras
pt: Foies gras de patos